Utah statutes.
4-24-13.   Brand inspection required prior to slaughter -- Exceptions.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a brand inspection is required before any cattle, calves, horses, domesticated elk, or mules are slaughtered.

(2)  A person may slaughter cattle, calves, horses, or mules for that person's own use without a brand inspection if the requirements of Subsection 4-32-4(2) are met.

